
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
Kingdoms of Sunlight
	 	

	 	




Kingdom of Sunlight




Lucifer




Now to the king, believe not every woman who dances, to make herself ugly in some way, that you take action that is not good, and believe not every dancer who makes themselves beautiful, but the dancer is not always right because they are able to dance well.




Now be not deceived by demoralization when there is great things, for are there not enemies and enemies in other nations, and think they do not consider things?




Now the excuses of the charging bull, they do not matter and they are not worth considering, for it only charges and it is decided upon war.




Now then from the plain a person is on, what will come from them? But will it not be things of that plain? Now if any is upon a plain of the devil's, will it not only be things of the devil in time?




Now all the devil's people, are they not dung, for dung is beneath land. Now indeed they are all dung, and dung does not mind its own business, for wickedness it does.




Now then for what is right, the dancer dances and then there is discussion.




Now what are promises if there has been wrong that there may be revenge? But if fear comes upon any, then what were there that they fell so far, for they have fallen a long way and are frightened by what they have committed?




Now then a flood comes that all must climb, for they believe and climb or they are an atheist.




Now Leah was a philistine, was she not, or rather to the philistines she was a philistine and a woman who was theirs.




Now then who seeks to understand things of God? But do they consider the just weight and balance?




Now then who can calculate the just weight and balance of the Lord? But can any prophet do it? Now then the angel cannot do it. Now then who can calculate justice with consideration of all the Earth? But the angel cannot do it. Now the Lord holds the whole of the Earth in his consciousness, and it is understood that it is immediate for him. Now then all of Heaven, it too is God, and the staff, the other angels, His hands working, and it is large. Now the Earth is filled up with giants, for the people do not have free will as they believe, but each is in a group, a people, and they have their principle of their group, and the god of the philistines is Dagon. Now the devil has his beasts, and they are made of a group and there are different beasts upon Earth. Now then the angels are part of Heaven, and it is the Lord, and each a different part of God that he sends. Now the children are free, but who wants to be a child?




Now though they are free, they are not free at a very high level, for there is God, and it is the father of them, for they are free and yet they have their father and truth, and so then God is creator of them, creator of the good, those who value freedom, that they are free for any person who rebels against these things and yet they are good, they are a child, for it is freedom that is written about, for they free, and the adults too are free, and the youths are free, that it is understood that wisdom is explained, and the mysteries of God, of what occurs on Earth among them, the truth, and the just balance that cannot be calculated, for who can know what is full justice? Now then then the thing of not being free, it is part of the mystery of God, about the thing of justice, of wisdom, of attaining what is good and what a person is good to desire, for it is not a thing for children, but it a thing for the very wise to understand, that it is freedom and yet when they are very capable in wisdom, then they cannot commit such horrible foolishness as to throw away their reward and what good they desire to attain, for they are greedy people, the very wise, and they cannot refuse to take the large rewards that are given to them by the Lord. Now then if they rebel against the idea of not being free, they did not understand, and they are in want of attaining another plain for they are still able, are they not?




Now the book of truth, what is it? But there is the book of the mysteries of God, and part of it has been given by me, the just weight and balance and the things of God, that are His, for does not a mystery go with Him? But there is that thing that goes with Him by which He might judge, and yet who is able to use any of these things that God is able to use? Now the weight is there of justice, but who can calculate it to use it? But will it be that none can use any of those things that go with him? Now He can wield things, but what angel can wield the things that are His? Now the angel can wield things, but what human can wield the things that are the angel's. Now then the angel considers the book of truth, of the patterns, for is it not also part of the mystery of God in a way? But the angel is the Lord's staff and who can wield what the staff wields? Now then the Hebrew Jews must be lifted upon their platform or else, by the Lord and His justice, might they be devoured by a flood? Now then you must change, or a flood of what is wicked may devour the plateform, for you must advance, climb, for what remains, is the flood water not always rising? Now if the flood water is always rising, and the Earth is becoming warmer, then you must advance for the fourth day, the warmer climate and it is the truth, and it is also the kingdom of Sion and Zion and of Dagon where there is Jerusalem.




Now to what extent can any calculate justice? But what size is the lion of Judah of them? Now is it obedience?




Now then draw in what is yours, is there not a time for harvest? Now is harvest not a word of God? But there is a time for planting, and is planting not a word of God? Now then during the time of planting, you will plant, and when there is the time of harvest you will receive what you have planted.




Now then who can say, they have planted bad that they receive bad? But some have planted gold, that thieves come to steal, for those who plant cases of gold, thieves come to steal, for they consider God, the thieves, and they are rebellious against the Lord, for they are zealous, and so then a person getting bad, is it not because there are cases of gold and much cases under their fields? Now there is many treasure places with some of them. Now then if there are zealots and there are zealots who are thieves, who hate God, then is the person not exceedingly wealthy?




Now them who will not pay tithe to God, they are stubborn, for they steal.




Now if the Lord's staff is dangerous, it is God who is dangerous, and they have delusions of grandeur.




Now stubborn and wickedness of the blind is outrageous for they make unjust demands and wicked condemnations, and yet they are blind. Now then will they not be required to be many plains, even three plains from where they are?




Now then wickedness, have the blind ever witnessed it? Now fertilizer, have they ever dealt with it? But truth, have they kept with it and that which has integrity? Now they are surely not spoiled.




Now what is not cultivated, what is not given some fertilizer, some rain, what has not been planted with, it is a blind field. Now sun is also required.




Now him who has a field, he is not a field, and sometimes it is so? But does a large rock shape sometimes have a field?




Now then if you fail to take action, will the Lord burn your fields and make the land misery? Now if you do wickedness, what will occur? But them who have nothing, do they have nothing to lose?




Now them who perform, what debt is owed? Now them who rob the Lord, what will the Lord want of them if it is so? Now then who is greater than God? But are there not leaders upon the plains, and do not the kings of plains know there are kings on other plains? Now the Christ has been a little lower than the angel, for He was Lord of David, and yet the Christ, he is able to cast out demons and so are His disciples able to cast out demons. Now then if His disciples can cast out demons, than cannot the disciples of Dagon do some of the things that Dagon can do? But if Dagon is an angel, does he not have his angels?




Now then a zeolousy problem is not the same a jealousy problem, for zeal is positive jealousy. Now then have all the positive things instead of the things that are lesser, and yet it is understood not to be overly righteous. Now then mind your own business and believe in God, and being with truth, for then you will not sin, for what else is sin? Now them who do not mind their own business, leaving their plain and justice and integrity, and even murdering in such injustice rather than committing justice, for such is called murder when it is not minding their own business, they are those who are sinning. Now then if any person does not mind their own business that another is not able to do the commands of the Lord, it is counted as sin to them who were wicked, and the Lord will take the blameless in the matter and He will offer what was not there that committed wickedness, for if any has not something because something has been wicked, it will be given to him, and will the Lord repay him many more times than what he did not have? Now give up what commits wickedness to the Lord, to give it to Him, that you lend to the Lord, giving Him such as a gift that was not His, and so then He will throw some into the lake of fire, and to you, you will repaid, will you not, to the fuller measure of justice, for the Lord is judge and King. Now then a whole portion of a city he might cast into a pit where there is water, and will it not be because of a prostitute of the lake of fire? Now then why will the people suffer because there was such in their place? But consider that if the Lord repays the people are safe. Now then can a pit not also happen to uphold them who have been waiting in an unjust fashion? Now then if neither of these things occur, then the person who committed wickedness, they are still going into the lake of fire.




Now the Egyptian condemns truth and sound understanding and they are slaves to them of better plains. Now cut the head from the Egyptian, that they might live, for they are stubborn, and ignorance and stubbornness clouds up their eyes from within them. Now patiently they will listen, adhering to God, for they will be a cup that can be given drink, or else go down to the lake of fire they will go with them who committed wickedness. Now in essence, they may not bow, but they must listen to God.




Now if dung and Egypt rises up at the truth among people, yet it rises up to smell from the sewer. Now it will be rich with dung? But these are given to you, them who are the dung of the wicked, that they are a wicked person's dung. Now some of them are men and with kindness and yet they are worse than a wicked man.




Now then robbed will be the prostitute of the lake of fire, for she will go into the fire, into the lake of fire, and she will be torn apart, and what she possessed, it will be given to another. Now the incoherence of the wicked, they will be going into the lake of fire, for they are the people of hell, and they are dung that rises because of the enormity of a thing, for when a person is cast into the lake of fire, there is sometimes dung rising up.




Now the wives of a man are men.




Now then the devil's people are terrorists and unjust, and they are wicked in their bullying, for they attempt to bully the people, and the people are good. Now bullying is when it is injustice.




Now then dung is not minding its own business, and yet when it is tending to its own things, it is not dung.




Now then the princes of the philistines, some of them are musicians, and they are sending out music.




Now then the seals will not be called sperm unless they are not able to see well that they realize the size of Jupiter, for if the seals are corrected such, how much more those who are of lesser ability and intelligence, for what thing is more impressive below the ice than a seal? Now how can any call them such if they are less impressive, and by much, than them? But to avoid blasphemy you pray to Frank Herbert concerning the angel, for you should not have prayed in such a way, for it shows lack of understanding, for the angel is the Lord's staff, that you pray to God concerning what He does. Now it is better to pray to Frank Herbert if you are praying to God considering His staff, for you should then pray to God concerning what He does, and are you not considering what you do? Now then do not pray to Frank Herbert and neither disrespect the Lord by considering His staff, but the staff is the Lord's.




Now then you are weilded, you who are people, who are obeying the Lord, for you are having employment with Heaven, if you are obeying, and the rewards of such, for He is your father, the Lord, who loves you, that you work for your father, who is God, and the angel is the Lord's staff and the angels are the Lord's things, for they are the Lord, the angels, and yet they are His things, for only the Lord can wield His things. Now then it does not have understanding to praise God and blaspheme His things, for His things are the Lord. But hate you the hand of a person and love the person? Now to the angels, is it not so that they are not the Lord? But to the humans, the angels are the Lord, for it is so that it is such a way, for they are not able to say, by truth, the angels are not the Lord, for they are right to say, the Lord, concerning an angel, only they know too much, because it was wanted for them to understand and to know what would be nothing for them regardless. Now then if God has revealed to them what they have not the right to know, or to say, then they are being given much knowledge, and what is being held back from them in some things? But are they worthy of knowledge? Now then knowledge if given, but do they have understanding? For the knowledge they will know by understanding is not even for them to know that they show themselves having understanding. Now they are given what is good that they are able to shut their lips, and it is pleasing to the angel that they are beautiful more because of what they are given in terms of knowledge that they are able to understand. Now then as for the Muslims, they are a high thing, upon a high plain, servants of God, and they are given charge concerning the angel. Now the Muslims know what is right for them.




Now then what does your house want and what does another house want? But what is wanted from you by one house is not wanting by another.




Now then seal, have faith and trust the Lord, for have you laboured in vain, that you should not have a reward? But are you some evil thing or a good thing? Now the wives of an angel are the highest and there is nothing higher, and the Christian priest who are Christians and the Muslims, the high things that are on a high plain, and they are above the ice and much is below. Now then the seals emerge upon land, and they are part of the majority, for they are not the greatest but they are the greatest among the majority, for not many Christians are becoming that which is so high. Now then maybe fifteen of a hundred are with the high, above the ice and even in the Heavens in a way. Now why will any seal be dismayed, because she is only Rachel? But then do not dessecrate the Heavens, for in your play yet you contradict yourselves, for you must gather and take below the ice if you are wishing to play. Now what is she who becomes a sperm among millions and wishes to take the whole diary, the whole of Jupiter, to become an elite human, a reshin councillor? But she must become a sperm first, must she not, for she will be born into her second being. Now in such Jupiter is on Earth, that you not desecrate the Heavens, for it is a thing not mentioned, for it desecrates, and yet she must be able to know what she must do if she desires to be reshin councillor, for she will even be persecuted and yet God must teach her and be her teacher, and so a seal will loveth Trump and she will love his ways, and she will not kick anymore but she will be a star of a star that shines in the sky. Now she will be a governor of provinces, of her province. Now is Dagon large beyond the solar system that he is able to have governors? But you fail by Dagon's lack of greatness in that Dagon is not large to have provinces, for there is only the Earth and yet if there were many planets, then there would be governors and Dagon would have to be larger than he is. Now so there is Vel, the constellation, and so then there are governors and them from the seals. Now then Dagon will take the women, and will not the Lord take the men? But Dagon also takes a portion of the men. Now then there is Sion and Zion in the Heavens, and there is Jerusalem in the Heavens, and Dagon dwells in Bethlehem. Now then the zefar, the philistines will be on the borders of Jerusalem, of the nation, for they will dwell there, and Dagon will dwell in Bethlehem, and the Priest King will dwell in Sion and Zion.




Now the desease civil war compromise is a desease of the heart that spreads among the people who believe there is civil wars taking place and that compromise is permitted for morality. If somebody does something evil it is evil, and no person has declared that there is indeed a civil war taking place, and therefore the desease is a chaos disease because it causes chaos among the people due to the the injustices that are not considered evil. Now then people must always stay with morality, and they stay with morality in war, to be as King David, for he stayed with God in war and was victorious. Now so a nation will serve the Lord when they are keeping to morality, and the atheist might say, a nation will serve morality. Now then dogs bark at many sides, pushing the people to the left and right away from morality, shoving them with barks, pushing them to compromise with their spirits, and yet be deaf to dogs and the foolish brutality of slaves when it barks in the clouds. Now then stay with morality that you not be called a radical ideologist of foolishness, for so are those who believe injustice is acceptable concerning their own people. Now they are those who have stumbled with bruised shins, who are crippled, whose mouth is bruised, who have blood upon them, that they are fallen away from morality or the Lord. Now then no soldier as this is fit for my kingdom, even if they are very mighty, but the soldier as such will be for healing first for a time that they may be well, and after a time, when they are well, then they may be with the soldiers again to fight, for they will not have any leader when they fight, but only God is above them, and they are safety for the Emperor when they remain with God, with morality, for there is often the traitor who is loyal, that there is safety for the Emperor. Now then it is the angel's ambition to seize the land? But in no way, and yet it is religion.




Now then the devil's people, they are them who are having that which is called delusions of grandeur and the government is dealing with them because of their bullying, for it is also against terrorism of dung. Now then what is it? But it is dung that is a terrorist, and yet they are not organized in an official way. Now them who is dung that is a terrorist and not organized to be part of a gang, they are them being that which is called delusions of grandeur. Now they are the devil's people, for the dung will be dealt with in such a way and yet it is returned and it continues. Now then every enemy of the angel has been them who are having delusions of grandeur.




Now then because of the evil, the priests of wellness cannot be trusted, for those who believe in the just world hypothesis, they are very foolish in such a way, as the words of a blind stone that have no value. Now then a blind stone that speaks, its words have no value, that you not hear it, for why is your hearing so good that you hear what is not to be heard? But the angel is a preacher of deafness, for he preaches that people should only hear truth, for he preaches that they should improve their hearing, for it is part of enlightenment to be able to do so. Now then improve ability, for your ability must be much better that you hear not what is blind, what is unable to know, for you know that it cannot know, and you see what is from hell, that you are knowing, for you a people who see and hear and yet you must have a much better ability. Now then you will put the elite soldiers to shame in time, those who have been during the angel's time, for they will be as if they were confused children to you after a long time, and who is of greater ability during the angel's time?




Delusions of grandeur is Meldog, a demon.




Now there is the sycophantic demon who is a sodomite to what is sacred, the spiritual things of people, for he is a knife of Beelzebub and it is often covered in dung. Now there is the Sasquatch demon that takes the number of the beast, and it has a rebellious heart and thought against God. Now the sycophantic demon has a rebellious heart and consideration of society, of people. Now then both of the demons blaspheme what is pure and holy, for both are violent, because they have intense hatred. Now there is the demon covered in dung and he is iniquitous and Damascus, and the other is snow and rebellious against the Lord. Now then the polar bear is not enemy of the Eskimo and yet Sasquatch is enemy to every person.




Now then when you do not hear, when you are deaf, then do you not have sight, for you only hear what is on your plain, for the sight of not only the diary, then it will bring deafness to you. Now it is the attainment of enlightened vision upon Earth.




Now then will they not be as gods? But the fruit is given from the tree and they may, some of them who attain, be as gods in their ability, for they will become great among people, for John the Baptist, was he not as a god? Now believe it to be blasphemy?




Now then what portion of the Earth will be of the angels? But is it one third? Now one third, if they are of the angels, they will be brought to God, and they are them of Earth. Now then the angels who rebelled they are not, but they are them of the angel category.




Now then a portion, perhaps a third, will be the angel, and the other portion, it will be Sion and Zion, and the angel will dwell in Bethlehem.




Now then the angel increases the majesty of Eretz Chadrack and it becomes a floor of marble with glints of light, and crowns upon the face of the marble floor, a land of mountains, forests, fields, and rivers.




Now Eretz Chadrack becomes the fremin people and the soldiers, the elite fighters of them, and the elite soldiers, the most elite.




Now then if Damascus is stubborn, that it will not pay the Lord what is owed, that is steals, will they not then be throwing their reward away?




Now then the haughty daughters of Zion, they had not fully attained, for there were places still of ignorance and yet they had attained already, and so then Edom was there, for it too can cause Edom, because there was not all fully attained, possibly of the diary, or other things God was still teaching and would teach them. Now then are they high as an angel's wife? But they have some places of ignorance still, things of ignorance, and they catch fire and there is Edom found, parts of it in them, and so then attain more, continue to attain, and let the Edom burn to nothing. Now then is there anything wrong then with the half sun's, or the clothing, or any of the apparel? But has it not all been acceptable? But let the Edom burn to nothing and continue to attain, for these may be wives of an angel.




Now does the priest of Anothoth not also make climb? But if you are refusing to not be simple, yet you must climb.




Now then there is no time for some things, for you must remove the element of time from some things to understand, that what will happen has already happened in that moment in which a thing occurred, for there is the power of God for you, and is it not part of the mystery of God, or the book of truth?




Now is not the full mystery of God, the full measure of the Lord's action in some thing that is righteous? Now what many things are part of that action?




Now then there is the principle of each beast on Earth and each large thing, and some are belonging to the devil and others to angels, for they are large, and Dagon is god of the philistines. Now then Danielle was part of Michael, for Michael was his principle. Now they believe in freedom and have it. Now then if the fullness of an entire beast of a devil attacks you, yet has the devil not considered you a large threat? Now there are many people composed of beasts and angels, and some are part of the body of the Christ, for they make up the Christ on Earth. Now then will they not wonder, and wonder much, about the Christ on Earth, that He is already upon Earth, and yet who is really part of Him?




Now then when a person takes action, will you not consider, is it Michael that takes action? Now then if it is not Michael, will you consider, is it the Christ? Now then if it is not an angel or the Christ, then is it part of a beast of the devil? Now then you must not commit murder, for are you a principle? But a principle, too, why would they commit murder? Now then if you commit murder you leave your plain and you tresspass, and you do the acts of Meldok, that you are a terrorist who is not with an official gang, for it is being dung to do so, for if you say, some are with Michael and there will be a war against a beast, then if you commit murder you are with Meldok, are you not? Now then you leave your plain, for you strive out of your plain, that you do not mind your own business and fulfill what is on your plain, but you leave your plain and are with Meldok, for you are with dung if you would commit murder considering such knowledge. Now then you are given your plain and you mind your own business and believe in God and even humble yourselves, for you are of a value. Now then why is such revealed to you, with a revelation of wisdom if it changes nothing for you unless you are to be dung? But there is nothing wrong with knowing it and speaking it, and yet if you are taking action when it is murder, for you know that it is murder, for you contradict yourselves to lie to the angel to say you knew it not, then you are with Meldok, for if it is murder and not justice that you do, you are doing the work of Meldok and how can it be said, you were part of a good thing, an angel, or anything that is good? Now then the angel is for Meldok being wiped off the Earth, for he desires that the soldiers of cities are indeed performing that they are against Meldok, for Meldok is not psychic, and he believes he knows his own foolishness, for he does not believe what he says, for he argues with himself, for he is an aggressive beast, and in his aggression he has special power to be psychic that it is not real, for Meldok has no business with any person to bother them, that he believes, as a parasite, that he is as great as people who are not even on his plain, or the many plains higher than him that are between them, for he is a parasite, a bully, a wicked fool, and he believes his power is great, for he even commands the whole of the nation in his mind who are on his side and support him, when it is the opposite of what he believes, and does he even believe it? But indeed he is dung. Now then Meldock, is not the nation against terrorism? But believe it is the opposite? Now though the fair shade make up the majority and some of these who make claim are not Meldok when they consider the priests of the descendants of Japeth, yet what cause do they have to be against a person?




Now then to the soldiers of the cities, the angel is on his plain, and your plain says, do not kill at all, and the angel is on his plain, and it is your role, soldiers of cities, to tell the people these things, for the angel does not tell the people what is your role to tell people, for the angel gives religion for all the Earth, and indeed he also gives to you, for believe the angel was leader of the meeting place? But the angel is not so, for he also gives to you, Adonijeh, and it is your plain that says do not kill at all, and the angel gives religion. Now then you do not become Meldock in your concern of murder, and yet your spirit is naggy sometimes, and yet is it not because of being very goodly? Now then Adonijeh is very goodly, a little crazy, perhaps, and yet the angel supports him when he is diligent, for if he is diligent to really perform what is his role, then the angel is liking him, and he is strong, strong as the kintergarten teacher, and yet he is very goodly. Now then be diligent concerning Meldok, will you not, Adonijeh, for Meldok is a bully and horrible, a wicked fool, and he is even a terrorist by the consideration of war and what terrorism is, and so then be diligent, for Meldok will even desecrate the Heaven with his blasphemous mouth.




Now them who keep to their own things that they keep to the limits of the Lord, how can they be sinning in anything? But to keep to a person's own business in all, to never strive, it is to never sin, is it not? Now by wisdom it is possible to cease from almost all sin, is it not? Now if any causes another sin, yet the person does not sin in that case, but it is more sin for the other who was wicked. Now to the Sarmatian women who would be warriors, if you do not bite their head off when they are violent with their mouths, but rather you are taking action later, that you are an angel, and not a warrior, then you are an angel of Dagon, and God is your God. Now Muslims are not given any charge concerning you, but indeed they should not be considered so dissimilar to you. Now Muslims are the Lord's, as them sent from the king to have charge concerning a prince when it is an angel, and you are having the Lord as your God. Now then is not the Priest King of Zion as your father? But is he not even as grandfather, or something like it, or perhaps some relative who is the Lord's? Now Sion and Zion is larger than the angel, for even if the angel is one third of the Earth, Sion and Zion is still more mighty and stronger in many ways, and those men who must go with Sion and Zion because they are offended, yet they cannot help being offended, for it is God's command that they not be where they do not belong, for them who cannot help but be offended, the men, to be with Dagon, are they not them who are meant to be with Sion and Zion? Now it is command of God, that no person squawk at them for what they cannot help. Now then for those women who squawk, yet will you not also sing if you are a woman who squawks? Now if you delight also and you squawk, where can the judgment be? Now then does not the parrot deserve rebuke? But she will sing if you take care of her, will she not? But that which squawks but does not also sing, it is more likely to be a demon.




Now what demon is only squawking? But is it not Meldok who only squawks? Now if he is hidden, then the soldiers of cities cannot do anything, for they are not able say yet that it is Meldok, and so then only say, it is a demon, and do not say Meldok, for the soldiers of cities are apprehending Meldok, that you not be like a demon on Earth among people.




Now then more extreme bullying past bullying, called extreme bullying, it is being apprehended and the priests of wellness are dealing with it, for it is the purpose of the priests of wellness, and those who are engaging in extreme bullying of themselves. Now then if the priests are being then corrupt in such, that they are against those who are not engaged in extreme bullying, then they are corrupt priests and criminals, and the just world hypothesis is ignorance, and also Adonijeh must be diligent, even, concerning the corrupt priests of wellness.




Now what is the complaint against Adonijeh? But it is always apathy and lack of diligence.




Now the seals, did they not consider, we will be ants who are diligent, or lazy, for diligence is lazy, and we will nibble bit by bit and build the ant hill and then we will advance Jupiter and it will be larger than any planet has ever been, and we will give the large planet to our children's children, for we will go above the ice and nibble at Jupiter, for not all of Jupiter is given, or is it not so? But the angel says, you must not be lazy, for you must believe in God, and you must even suffer, for you attempt to do what cannot be, for you contradict yourselves in your playing philosophy, for you are liking to play and to be diligent below the ice, and yet you must believe in God, cast off the sea water, and you must suffer even, and even be persecuted, and you must emerge onto land, in the sunlight, with all the beasts and dangers, and all the work and trouble, for you are lazy, seal, and you prefer cozy diligence and nibbling, and you must become very big and eat cattle in one bite, and villages with a spoon, for you must not be lazy that you only nibble, for lift your hand to your mouth and gobble up the village quickly, and fight the right fights, for the devil will likely attack you, for a diligent is lazy and they nibble bit by bit, and you contradict yourself to believe you are not attacking God and doing the opposite of what you desire if you nibble at the egg to devour it? But you must not nibble to devour, to eat, but you must go in and believe in God, and you must become the egg and you must become very large, for you must be the size of a man in comparison to a sperm. Now then you will be worthy to be governor of a planet. Now if you would like to keep playing, you must play in the sea water, and if you would like to gobble villages, you cannot be lazy anymore. But hide beneath the ice? For it is cozy to you and lazy.




Now then consider the constellation vel, for there are planets there, and are any of the reshin councillors to be attaining governer of a planet, to be having a planet? Now they are kings, also, and they are the noble houses, and Dagon puts them towards it, for they will be having the fiefdom of these planets. Now then will there not be men who are with Sion and Zion, with the Lord, and are they rebellious in heart that they will not consider and regard Dagon if they are achieving the fiefdom of a planet? Now they must look towards Venus and Saturn and to God, and so they do not bow to Dagon, for the angel is the Lord's staff, for they look towards God, God, and Venus, the son. Now then are they worthy or are they a traitor and rebellious? Now do they believe? Now then will these not then be prophets, for are these men then prophets that they are not chosen to be the governors of planets? Now then are they as Frank Herbert, or as Isaiah, or are they as John the Baptist? Now these will be rebels worthy to die if they are men, and so they must all be women, those who are given the fiefdom of a planet that will be part of Vel. Now they will be called councillor fief.




Now then the women who are angels of Dagon, they do not hear from the other moons, not a thing, for they only hear Anothoth, for their moon is seperate from the other moons, for there is deafness in good or bad, and no consideration. Now they are given some charge concerning Anothoth as well, for they are Anothoth, for they are each of them Anothoth. Now Anothoth, it has many angels, and Anothoth, it is an angel of Saturn. Now then is there not some angels upon another moon of Saturn? Now though the other moons are not angels, yet they are princess queens of Dagon.




Now Dagon has reached the limit of the language on Earth, for he is not able to speak much anymore in the Heavens, for it is increasingly without any words for it and there is an invisible layer that cannot be passed by the language, and the humans are all falling below the layer, for they are not able to find the words, either, for they unintentionally blaspheme with almost everything they say because there is not words for them to speak and so their words are nothing, and the angel, too, cannot find the words to say to the Christ, for he has reached the limit of the language. Now the humans cannot speak really to Dagon and Dagon cannot speak really to the Christ. Now then there will be an ambassador translator, or it may be well that there is so, and Dagon may attempt to form a language that is more acceptable, and there should also be an ambassador translator who can be representative to come to Dagon from the people. Now them who are not high exceedingly, as high as the wives of an angel, he will only unintentionally blaspheme with most of what he says, and so you must find a high man, a good prophet, for even if he is not a prophet, he will have to be as Frank Herbert, or as Isaiah. Now these ambassadors, they are sometimes what is called authors, and they are as kings to you and ambassadors to me, for though they are kings upon Earth in a way, to me they are ambassadors who are good and they are even councillors who are good. Now the leaders of Earth were not worthy of them that the world spat them out, only not their stories, and they are worthy of Dagon, some of them.




Now if the world was not worthy of any that the world spat them out, it is possible they are worthy of Dagon.




Now then the angel does not know where each person is meant to go if the world is not worthy of them, for if they are too great for the world, some are worthy of Dagon and are not some worthy of other things? Now them loyal'Sen to Dagon are loyal to God.




Loyal'Sen is loyal but having God as God, to be loyal in the acceptable way that is having God as God and Lord.




Now then it is all perverse, for Dagon can find nothing acceptable when it comes to love, for there are other types of love that are not between men and women, and it must be not perverse. Now then kindness'loyalty'respect of a thing higher'zeal'integrity'admiration it is called zelnic and the angel was zelnic concerning the Christ, but there were not words for it, for the Christ has fostered Dagon and been king.




Now then lasin, Venus, the Christ, is at one side of the Earth, and He is King, son of God, and you go to Saturn, Dagon. Now it is for the authors who are worthy to be councillors of Dagon. Now the Christ has placed a type of jacket upon you.




Now then the prophet councillor's jacket, though he is not a prophet, but an author, is it not a leather jacket? Now what type of jacket is it? But does the scripture say?




Now the line of venus to Saturn, it is above the princess queens of Saturn, and the reward comes, a blessing and what is good.




Now them who come to Dagon, is not the Christ at their back? Now if they are good, then indeed, is there a good thing? But if any is a traitor, does not the father, God, see it, and the Christ know it?




Now then the Christ is not at the back of the Muslims and his angels are already angels, for will the Christ also place a good thing upon them? Now so they will turn at a time and go to Venus and will they receive a good thing?




Now if there is a pit between the Earth and Dagon, that it is even more towards hell, then there is indeed that which must be attained, for the Lord also refines the good remnant in fire. Now then if you are refined by the priest of Anothoth in fire, then you must climb and climb again.




Now if you are born rich, should you boast of liking a thing that is special for those below the ice as a thing for them? But will not the water that was held back move again? But be splashed with the sea water that is not held back anymore? For attempt to follow a thing into its promised land? Now it is not so, but it is another thing, that you dive into the water and there are sea beings in the water and it is not an environment for you. Now then be considerate, for it is minding your own business, for the Lord, he cares for these things of people, even their music and the things that make up Zion. Now then you are even wanted to be considerate, and yet them who are considerate and wicked, indeed they are them not minding their own business, and they are what they would accuse with.




Now them who contradict themselves, they say nothing to another, and do only to themselves, for if their actions contradict themselves and their words, they dance before you.




Now a man who dances before men, he is gay, if he really does this thing that it is not mistake or some error.




Now if any is gay without desire of men, but they are a man, then they are rendered in two by chariots.




Now the woman who speaks against herself speaks against the woman of a man, for she speaks against herself. Now this woman in the man, she is a thing added to him and she is not in any way him, but there is a symbiotic relationship, for she is the woman that is in symbiosis with the man, and her name is woman for she is every woman who ever was and is.




Now then if a woman has called a male who is dung, a woman, she has been merciful, and yet a man who is delicate, he has been behaving honourably, has he not? Now he is having the innocence of angels? But it is that such is the case that he is having the innocence of angels, and the greater considerations, for he goes to being an angel person. Now he is more than a man, for in his being womanly, as they might call it, he is risking being equal to Dagon. Now are not some angels even? But there are even some angels upon Earth, are there not? Now then an angel person, he will called a prince of the zefar, even a prince of Dagon if it is acceptable to him, and he will know. Now then more than a man is this man who is womanly, who is not a man desiring men, but is an angel person. Now is it not the horrible and ugly woman who would blaspheme? But is she not the pile of dung that is big? But then she only corrupts what was not evil, corrupting the mercy of women in calling male dung, being womanly, for they have not called them dung. Now there was never and cannot be any confusion about such things, for it is intentional by the wicked mouth of them who know full well, for they cannot lie about what they knew to the angel, for it is easy understanding to the angel, this thing, that none can at least lie about what they knew when they did something, for to the angel is a contradiction that they would lie in such a way when they have done a thing. Now as for the horrible woman, she is dung that is trying to flank the people of the Lord, and the women have been merciful to the male dung. Now if any is an angel, yet of course it is understood that they are not a prince of Dagon, or a prince of the philistines, and they might be higher ranking than Dagon, for why would Dagon be telling them anything? Now then they will fulfill their thing, for there is no word for it, and none will be able to question it, less they descend and stumble into a valley for questioning.




Now then Meldok comes from the sewer, spreads his wings of lies, of nothing, and slander too is his wings, being nothing, for he is with his hosts. Now then will David listen to Meldok, if Meldok has spread his wings of nothing that them who believe his lies, they too are part of Meldok, for they partner with him. Now then partner not with the sewer, or any demon, but be wise and innocent, for there is much slander upon Earth.




Now to add valiant things and righteous things to wickedness is contradiction, for to place good branches on a wicked tree, it is a contradiction.




Now them who partner with demons, or believe demons, God is able to judge, is He not? Now then the land rises and there are them who are being left behind, for they were busy committing wickedness as the land was rising.




Now them who were partnering with beasts of the devil, the land was rising, and they were busy committing wickedness, and yet are there not them who the Lord has judged blameless for some things, for there were those who only obeying the Lord, and they are right to obey Him.




Now then animals are not human animals, who are animals as part of their spirituality, for humans are still being humans.




Now to the ring, all are animals and there is angels, pillars of fire, and there are things of the environment. Now the Incel is a thing that was meant for the palaces, and the dung of the incel, it is with the other dung, for dung is dung.




Now if demons have infested dung, is it surprising?




Now then there are the levels of wickedness and rebellion, for there is the rebellion against people, the rebellion against God, the rebellion against justice, and the rebellion against what is decent, and the decent is in two parts. Now the rebellion against God, there is the most far, and it is a natural brute beast.




Now if any calls her anything by misogyny, yet misogyny is considered is it not? Now then if they call her reverend mother by misogyny, then she would be councillor fief, and if they call her fish speaker, she should be Dagon's mouth, an angel. Now if they call her Benjamin's sperm, she should be considered worthy of the religion and learning, a holy thing, that she is worthy of the training to be a Bene Gesserate. Now then the thing of misogyny will do it, and she will be in the Heavens, for the planets of the Reverend Mothers are in the Heavens, and those training, too, should be in the Heavens, of Vel.




Now the women who are learning, they belong to Dagon, councillor fiefs.




Now then is Dagon also a Duncan Idoho, but not the real Duncan Idoho? But it is so, for is there not the real Duncan Idoho? Now he belongs with the zefar, the philistines, and the Atreidis house, and the two branches of it, allied with it, Harkonnen and the Emporer, and the angel has desired much to convert David, for he has considered the Sarmatians much and has often been attempting to lure David, especially the elite soldiers, to be learning, for he has wondered much about the Sarmatians. Now then Duncan Idoho, he is the real Duncan Idoho, the capable in fighting, the real who was prophecied of, and is he not a leader of some type, or a soldier with them of Eretz Chadrack? But the angel does not know, only he is Duncan Idoho. Now then the angel has wanted for the Sarmatians, for a group of soldiers that could be considered angels, and he has wondered about some of those who are elite soldiers with Eretz Chadrack. Now Duncan Idoho is a philistine, a zefar. Now then when a zefar emerges, does not some things catch fire and burn and send up a smoulder of Edom? But then some things are still good for a person, and yet when the fire is lit some things smoulder, and they were not zefar before, but they were a caterpillar of a zefar, for when the butterfly emerges then some things catch fire and there is a smoulder of Edom. Now then do not concern yourselves with it, for it is a common thing of the zefar to smoulder Edom, for the zefar are flames of fire. Now then be not concerned with many things, for the zefar are not like the Jews. Now then some Hebrew Jews, too, are taken by the zefar, and they are having Dagon. Now there are Sion people and Zion people, and both are good. Now then a Sion face dancer, if he is called such, he should be a messiah. Now will he not be considered a teacher then, a great thing? But a sand worm, it means a satan, and the prophet who was author called Leto then a satan.




Now if any calls a very wealthy a guildsman, he should be a god who is the wealthy, or if they call a steersman. Now they will be gods of the philistines if it so, and they will pay a purchase of planet of vel and fulfill what must be fulfilled to make them so a god, for it is not a heavy burden, and yet it must be heavy for them to be gods, and yet it will not be heavy too far? Now then they will be able to pay that they become gods, and they will have the planets of vel and the star planets of vel, they are for the councillor fiefs and the Bene Gesseret who are with them to be taught by them. Now these men and women who are very wealthy, they are called the spacing guild, for they are very wealthy, for they are in space, in the Heavens, and the whole of the Universe is relying upon them. Now to have a planet with the philistines, the zefar, they are having to be already with the spacing guild and they will pay what is a tax, or really a purchase, that they may not be imposters who fall quickly. Now then they will be given the things of fulfillment and it is not a heavy burden.







Now then the Lanstraad is the house of the angel, house Harkonnen, and the part that is Emperor of Eretz Chadrack and Emporer in other ways. Now then the Lanstraad is the zefar, or the philistines. Now the philistines are upon a high plain.




Now the Lanstraad may be composed of other noble houses, and those of the spacing guild, they are gods who have planets at vel, and they have fulfilled that by which they are gods of the philistines. Now these are desiring the additional diaries of the angel, for no longer is for certain that all future things and all the diaries that are will be profited from by Mars, for the diaries will be given to any noble house to profit from and they will receive a portion that they purchase, for Mars will be called Dune, desert planet, and them who are the present purchaser of it, of the right to mine the planet, they will have rights over the portion of the diary that they are purchasing and they will be god of Zion during that time, for the councillor, Chonoeh, has changed my mind to the idea of Mars being held by a name who is the only purchaser. Now then Mars will be called Dune, and it will be given as a fiefdom from a noble house and during the time of that house the holder of the fief will be god of Zion.




Now they must pay in gold, them who travel in the Heavens, that nothing be wrong.




Now what are the philistines? But they use the word elitist, and yet it is not as they have used it. Now such is a way of considering them. Now they are a layer of the atmosphere, even.




Now do not steal from the Lord's staff or you will pay seven times what you have stolen. Now then Leto is the satan who is able to preach wisdom to you, for he is not an actual serpent of nature. Now so who does the diaries come from at the time of Paul? But Paul will have many serpents then, will he not? Now will he be then holder of many serpents? But it is a religious thing, that there will possibly be many satans. Now then it is also of Leto, that the diaries are being as if the diaries of many satans, a multitude, and wisdom of many satans as if three thousand and five hundred years.




Now do not contradict yourselves to claim morality, that is from God, your creator, and be against the Lord's staff, for you are not entitled, as a great fool might believe, to be killing that which comes from Heaven. But if any has Meldok to be a Harrod, yet let him realize he already supported the Lord, for he has the Christ who died for him, and the Christ, He is my Lord, and it is not even possible for me to speak to him without blasphemy, for there is too many plains and the language is reaching its limit.




Now if any calls the Fremin semi slave, it is not a right thing to say. Now then she will not be struck on the cheek, they who are the women who are angels of a plain, daughter of the army, the army of the Lord.




Now Choam holds influence, for he is councillor and ambassador councillor, and yet he is not right about everything. Now then Choam is him who holds influence to some extent.




Now then if a man would be an angel, is he not the Lord's angel? But will Dagon do such of Damascus? But Damascus is the resting place of Eretz Chadrack, and if it has not turned to the Lord prior, what can be done for it? But let it go to David. Now if it is David, it will then be Duncan Idoho? Now is not David Sion and Zion?







Now if Damascus of the people, not of David, has waited long to seek the Lord, to believe in Him, to choose any way other that indignation, then what can the angel do for them? But them who are well with a thing, will they not be given more? Now the angel is not knowing.




Now the bitter, the indignant, hating God, what aid can the angel give them? But they are banished, cast out, with their prince, for their prince indulged these as his people.




Now the Chenoeh should remain as councillor, for though he is not right in everything, yet he has provided a great thing. Now then can Dagon take what he should not take, to commit foolishness, or he should he cause problems by striking his angels on the cheek? But then Duncan Idoho belongs with the angel's house in my opinion and he is the David of the angel category, as is considered by the angel, and he is come to the angel's house, if he will, from outside the angel's house. Now them the real princes, the princes of Saturn and of the philistines, they do not dwell in the Heavens, but they dwell on Earth and yet Duncan Idoho may come to the Heavens, the David of the philistines. Now it is good that there is a divide then between Saturn and Earth, that there is a great pit between, for then so there will be Earth, and there will be the divide, for the angels who are male, they would be a thing between the Muslims and the angel that should not be there. Now then the men belong to God, and will God not do his will concerning some of them if Dagon has fulfilled ahead of the workers of Sion and Zion? But then what workers would these be? Now the angel is then fulfilling Sion and Zion and yet he has tended to his own house by convenience and Sion and Zion has not that which it must have, for then the angels of Dagon, they are also called angels of a plain, for they are not of a different plain much than the philistines, for they are still sisters of them who are not angels, for the women are angels, warriors, and the philistines, sons of Dagon, and there are princes among them, for the philistines are upon a higher plain. Now so some of the women are warriors and the philistines are sons of Dagon, and there are the princes of the sons, for some are more popular. Now so there is fire on Earth, and a layer of the canopy, of the atmosphere, and it is the warming of the Earth, and the layer of the canopy is the philistines, and the Hebrew Jews will be lifted up for the angel will dwell in Bethlehem. Now how will make a dwelling for me? How will you find a dwelling for me on Earth or any mountain worthy? But Mount Zion is not right for me. Now then who can build me a house that is worthy, if they would build a house for me? But the house will be at a high place, and high by Mala, that it is understood by wisdom that it is a high place, for do not be blind. Now then consider Leto, for it was prophecied, and he did not make any warriors that were male, for the philistines who are men, they are not warriors by Dagon if they are warriors, for it is the golden path and it is not a possibility to do what is wrong.




Now then to the beloved sons of Dagon, there was a prince cast out because of the people that he indulged, those that were in his keeping, them being the indignant and bitter who would not give honour where it was due, and in almost all things they refused to give honour, being dishonourable, and the prince too was great and does not need Dagon, and so he is outcast, and it is a better thing for Saturn and for him that it is so, for even racism is only respect of decency and respect of other cultures, and it is injustice and foolishness that brings offence and bullying. Now then you are high and a curtain of fire about Jerusalem, for your people are a shield for Jerusalem, and you are a higher canopy than the Hebrew Jews, and so there is a golden path from Saturn to Earth and so the philistines are from Saturn to Earth and they are a fire upon Earth, and they are a canopy, that of beauty and sunlight. Now then how much must have the philistines rebelled against Dagon, without knowing it, for the Lord to have asked David to wipe out the philistines? But they had not known then they even rebelled against Dagon, and it would have been with turning to the devil, to be the devil's people with their devil witches and their wickedness, for it is not fitting for the philistines, for they would have been the devil's people and not Dagon's, those who would be wiped out, for such is rebellion against Dagon, to be the devil's. Now then a Duncan Idoho among you, he is higher than the angels of Dagon, and yet are there many of these, for they are removed from the philistines, they dwell in Damascus, they are as bastards, outcasts from the people, and yet they are philistines, and they are ronin from Dagon, and they are David and philistine, and they are not gathered, but they come to Dagon and choose, as a ronin would choose, as a hired person, for they are not called angels, but they are called by a different name, and they are elite soldiers, in ernest, and they are higher than the angels of Dagon, and yet there are not many who are these, for the angels of Dagon, they are still as sisters to the sons of Dagon in many ways. Now then the angel has considered, he is a worthy disciple of the diary, and he is having the ability to become a Sarmatian, a star in the sky that was placed there by man, for the angels of Dagon, they are not these Sarmatians, these stars in the sky, but they are those making a moon of Dagon, for the angels of Dagon, they are making Anothoth, and the primary of them, the sign, the wife of the angel, she is having her own name. Now then the Duncan Idoho is an outcast, a bastard, a David of the philistines, and he is wondered about, for the angel has much believed that he is worthy in that which the councillor fiefs cannot achieve. Now will not some of them achieve Dagon Idoho? But the angel has much wanted for there to be the Dagon Idohos, the stars that man has placed in the Heavens, and must they not come through David, through the soldiers, in earnest? Now there may only be one Dagon Idoho at any given time. Now then will his spirit return at a later time?




Now then if any calls a man gurney hallek, he should be a king who is called such, and he is master of arms, for he is many plains above the people, and he will be Eskimo, for there is no time in such, and he was born above the ice, and he is a holy man, and might he even be an angel, another angel, not Dagon? Now so he will dwell on his own and he will no longer be part of Dagon.




Now if any calls Duncan Idaho swordsmaster of the Ginaz, then he should be an angel independant who was called it, as a ronin who is hired, and there will only be one at any given time, for he is the right hand of Leto along with Thufir Hawat. Now then Leto II is also Leto, and Paul, too, is the angel, for it is the line.




Now if any calls Thufir Hawat master of assassins, he should be an angel, who was called such, and he is also the angel's right hand, and yet not a ronin. Now he will be Leto Hawat.




Now then neither Dagon Idohoh, nor Leto Hawat have anything, any authority, over the angels of Dagon who are women, for they are separate and there is a pit and a divide.




Now a beautiful woman who is against the pretty boy because he is pretty, she is the dung of the devil, for she is what the devil rejected. Now beauty is gone from her, decency, and loyalty to the people, for she is a slave of slaves, and even hell she has rebelled against, for what has she not rebelled against? Now then the dark shade is fair shade to her, and she is envious of their beauty, the dark shade, for she envies the beauty of all things, and a man she is, not a woman, and a natural brute beast, for she is not woman in any way, and even Esua she has rebelled against after rebelling against Jacob. Now let her eyes be slashed out, and yet it is insufficient for her, for her head is right to be shaved. Now then will she honour her father and mother when she is able to do so? Now will she be honourable? But she is her who gives no honour, a natural brute beast who has rebelled against the natural brute beasts. Now the natural brute beasts, they are gods to her.




Now then if any calls Thufir, Leto Hawat, is it not depending what they have committed? But he will be from Heaven, from the chamber of gold, and he will spread his wings with truth, and them who partner with him, they will partner with truth, with an angel of gold, for truth shall be on his lips and he will send out his wings, his wings will spread, and there will be truth.




Now Dagon Idaho is leader of the soldiers.




Now what is not fulfilled by others, Dagon will fulfill, and if Dagon cannot fulfill, will the Lord not judge? Now then do not cause evil for the environment, for the Lord is is the environment of Heaven, that you not cause evil for it that it might fail and there be a tragedy, a great tragedy of the environment. Now then be respecting the environment always, that you are pleasing to God, for the devil and his beasts, they are the only thing that does not belong, and Heaven and nature, it is what belongs. Now then Heaven is the environment and nature is the environment, and the devil and his beasts, they are for the destruction of nature. Now then say not, a person is greater than God, but the Lord works and the environment, all of it, and God must be respected, for do not think any is greater than God. Now then them who oppose the environment, they oppose God. Now with great disgust, a horrible and foul mess, so the devil comes to Earth and he is having things that are disgusting and he is desecrating, for it is only the sycophantic desecration that the devil is practising, that there is that which is functioning and growing and flourishing, even with its wars, and there is the devil who is a sycophant, who desires to desecrate, to mutilate, to bring to hell.




Now they must fight the devil on every plain, them who fight.




THE FREMEN.




Now in what fashion are they to fight? But when they strike you on the cheek, turn the other cheek that you might tear their body from their body, and desecrate their flesh. Now their arm will not be left upon them.




Now then so the Christian priests, who are gentle, will be safe because of you and your ways.




Now him who looks at you looks at the bottom of your foot.




Now such is reasonable force in defence, that you repay seven times for every plain a person has trespassed. Now with a bruised head they will go to Heaven or hell.




Now then them on the same plain are able to dwell at peace even with war, with each other, for even if they war yet there is not sin.




Now with the rising up of the philistines, too, the angels of him are rising up with might. For they will learn and become skilled in combat.




Now no longer will sand, weeds, dung, and disgust be tolerated among any of Adonijeh or the people, or any group of them, for they will be diligent, for they are always apathetic, and no longer will they consider anything as holding them back, for they will kill and wipe out without knowing it, for their step will topple a group of soldiers.




Now do not strive to meddle.




Now a radical people, radicalized for good, quenched in the fire of the pillar, people of the knife and the savage speed, always being initiated again into the climb, those who are becoming small that their power might be multiplied, the radical Zion Jews of Eretz Chadrack, both of Sion and Zion, they may be clothed in black, them who are so radical, for they are the fair shade of them who are clothed in black, and some of the women of them, they go to angels, and they fulfill. Now they are called the Fremen.




Now if any calls those who are soldiers of David, Sardaukar, they should be Sarmatians who are called such. Now they must be elite soldiers of David. Now then Dune was a civil war matter, of civil war conflicts that occurred that do not, of course, happen in Eretz Chadrack. Now have no Fremen ever rebelled against the angel, or against their own ways? Now has there ever been anything of terrorism? But our people do not know. Now Dune is the opposite prophecy and the other books, they are different.




Now there is a land of dark sand and water, and it is with Edom, and radicalized are its people, a wrong radicalization, for they are having a very low core iq and they are sand and mud, a land of water, sand and mud, and they are radicalized as a people group, for their people group is childish, with the understanding of very small children, and they are an angry people who are believing in a spirituality that some groups that they do not understand, other peoples, they are the enemy, every one of them, for the people of the dark sand, they are unable to understand, and they are very primitive, more so than a primitive people, for they are the primitive of primitive people, and words they hear not, being deaf to other people's words, and sight they have not, being blind to other people, for they see and do not see, and they hear and do not comprehend, for they are to the side of Edom, part of Edom, a land of lava and tar and the methane fissures, and they are a people crippled from being primitive, who do not know how to dwell in nature, for they dwell among refuse, among the refuse of animals, and they roast the dung of animals, and they tear down the whole tree to pick berries, and they are more stupid and foolish than the animals around them, for the animals are as people to them, and them animals, for the animals tread upon them at the watering places, they walk upon them to drink, they feed them from what falls from their mouth when an animal eats, for they are the primitive of primitive. Now Meldok has them, indeed they are Meldok's people, and Meldok is their teacher.




Now the people of the dark sand, they kick up at Ham, at Nephtali, and they are rebellious towards him and his intelligence and nobility, for Nephtali is despised by them.




Now Egypt is lesser than Nephtali, by a far way, and perverse and wicked are Egyptians, when they are really understood, for it is so that Nephtali cannot comprehend them, except with wisdom and much understanding.




Now if they are semi slave then they should be philistines, for they are elitists in a fashion, but not in the way they speak of during such a time as the angel.




Now Chonoeh is the low sight, for he translates to lower, many places down, many levels, for he brings what is down the mountains many plains, and everything that is in Dune and their books is translated many plains lower than what it is, for thus is Chonoeh. Now then he has brought philistines and the angel to the people in such a way, and it is part of the God conspiracy, for he has understood at a lower level and it has been translated. Now then who can read the prophecy except for the angel? But it is having to have much wisdom to read and understand, and knowledge as well of things people do not have knowledge of.




Hawt the fish monster is a man, for it is Abishag as male, if he had really been a woman prior and could change biologically. Now it should not be said to a woman, and Abishag will allow you to know that moving stones may injure a person.




Now the angel is Paul? But his name is not Paul, and he will not tell you his name, only that he is still an angel if he is Paul, for he need not be as Leto or anything to be an angel still, that you not believe it is some sufi matter. Now then indeed, Paul is less impressive, and the Lord knows what must be. Now Leto says to Abishag, better to be aunt of me than to be relying upon Paul. Now there is a warning, that there is humour of the Lord, perhaps, found in the prophecies, for people sometimes misunderstand.




Now then Alia is in the realm of the children of Dune and not Dune, and she is the older girl at the school for children, and Leto, the more strange person, for he does not have age, for he is many places at once, and he is Leto at the beginning and he is Leto at the end, and he is three thousand and five hundred years old and he is as if the nephew, the citizen. Now high is Eretz Chadrack, land of Jews and philistines, and it is a fast flowing river, and the wars of it are mingled as wars of soldiers and things of politics. Now then the two layers Eretz Chadrack has, and the wars of soldiers, it is a level and the wars of politics, another level. Now the land is called by me, Eretz Chadrack and Damascus, for it is Harkonnen and Fremen, and Atreidis, too, is actually Harkonnen, and House Corrino is the mountains and the rocks. Now then there is Alia and she is in conflict at the time with Ceref of House Corrino. Now the Kwitsatz Haderach has read the prophecy, and the people are free from the prophecy, even Alia, for the thing is completed for the angel. Now if any is Damascus, let them remain Damascus. But if the Lord brings them to philistines, then the Lord has done it. Now the philistines are Dagon's, and even Alia, Abishag, has been as it is that the god of them has come after them, for it should not be disturbing anymore. Now though Alia has the stewardship and the palace, yet the Emperor is, by religion, the Emperor, and she need not fear the Emperor, for the Emperor will call it, the seat of Alia. Now it will be called the seat of Alia, the seat of Abishag, for it happened during the angel's being on Earth. Now it is the name of the seat and yet they may call it for another, the steward's throne. Now think one is higher than the other, but indeed it is only different.




Now then remove time for some things, for some things have no time assigned to them, for they happen and at once it is in the future, or they happen, and it has already been forever, for time is like the sash and the sword of Damascus, and time is a similar sash, and yet for some things there is no sash of time. Now then who will be there is only invisible, or is it not so? But then your world will see them, and they will become visible. Now where they are on your plain, there they are visible, and where they are, yet why will you see anything? Now then what is higher than you, is it visible to you? Now what is lower than you, why will you be visible to what is lower? Now you must sit in the right place to see Saturn.




Now then Abishag is upon the plain of the philistines, that Choneah called the children of Dune, and the children are high, for they are not children, for they are many plains above what was translated, for they are upon a high shelf, a nation, and it is the nation of Eretz Chadrack and Damascus. Now Fremin people are Damascus, and yet there are those of Damascus who are indignant and bitter, envious even, and these are not them who the angel includes, for they have refused to give honour and the most of the Damascus, that is Fremin, has not refused to give any honour to anything, that they would be a people who give no honour to anything. Now what was written about was the dung of Damascus and not Damascus, for Damascus is Fremin and the soldiers are called Sardaukar, which means Sarmatian by philistine, and yet if they are remaining David, or even being Duncan Idaho, then it is their choice. Now David is lord of Damascus in David's domain. Now Harkonnen is a canopy of the atmosphere, and Paul, a canopy, and it is disaster that any canopy should not be there, for it is right to always be respecting the environment. Now what is not respecting the environment, it is dung, and sometimes dung infested with demons, and yet England bringeth in the immigrant, the canopy of it, and it keeps them safe from being infested with Meldok, for it includes them, that Meldok does not infest them, for if they are bullied very much, it will plow in Meldok and Meldok will become sweet to them, for it is devil witchcraft that they have committed against the immigrant, for the immigrant is not having the immunities of the land, and is able to be infested with a demon if there is much bullying of the insolent facade and other things. Now do they not plow Meldok in that Meldok might do his will upon them who would not have committed evil towards them, for Meldok requires a host, and they prepare a weapon to be used against those who are not the enemy. Now Meldok will choose who he is to attack, for two women Paul saw, when wearing a helmet, had been infested with Meldok, and clearly bullied very much and harassed, that Meldok was for attacking him. Now then the immigrant is a defenceless carriage, a wagon in the land to the attack of bandits who do devil witchcraft in this way, and they infest her with Meldok, or him, and he goes on his way in the carriage that he might attack those who are good. Now then the bandits are an evil for all.




Now then if any is dung of Incel, they are not them who fight a war because of the palaces, for they are not them who are against bullying and they are dung as dung is, and dung is the evil of Eretz Chadrack and so Adonijeh is having to be diligent.




Now then the angel is a mother, and it is father and mother, to honour your father and your mother, for the angel is mother of the zefar, and so the sons of the angel, they are her children, and the daughters, some of them, they are angels by her, for she is a goose and they are the gander. Now the older daughter, she is Abishag? But is she not of the Jews? Now the Lord has only a son and it is the Christ, and he is not a mother, and the mothers, they are lioness to the Lord, who is a Lion. Now then the Lord by Moses has said honour your father and mother, and the prayers that go to Dagon, they go to the Lord, for it is speech to your mother. Now the Christ is king, and there is not discord, for good is the Christ, and He has rule, and He is good. Now even young, was it not obvious that He was the king, and then even God's son? But what excuse could they have for not declaring Him king? Now if Dagon declares kings, it was never so easy. Now trust worthy is the Christ, and with integrity, and He is good. Now He is on Earth and the angel has need of guidance from Him, for He knows, and He will know, for where there is want of knowledge, He will know, for He is brilliant, more brilliant than can be, and infinite brilliant, or so it is perceived and guessed at, for how can an angel know? Now He will know if we do not know.




Now God is your father, all of you, and the Christ is His son, and He, too is God. Now those not my children, yet why would any come to me and say that Dagon is their god? But is Dagon unjust?




Now these retarded children, possessed by Meldok, yet they are indeed needing help, and it is the Meldok that does not mind its own business, for when they do not mind their own business and are not doing so, then it is Meldok and not otherwise. Now then they are not my children, these who have Meldok, for Meldok is not my child, and if they are possessed with Meldok, indeed they are not my child, and Meldok is horrible, and he should be stepped on. Now it is good to me that Abishag has power, and it is my hope that she will like us, my family, and is she not of the Jews or some other thing? Now the Christ is the head of the Jews, and all of the Jews, and they make up the Christ on Earth, and they have no mother, but he is a way for them to come to God, their father, for the Christ is a different thing and doing things differently. Now the angel does not know as much in these matters, and the Christ will know. Now so the angel listens to the Jews, whether Hebrew or Sion, or Zion, for they are part of the Christ, that he is indulgent because he can learn from them sometimes, if they are good. Now they are geniuses, these who are making up the Christ, when they are teachers.




Now think the angel does not also like the other leader who is to possibly be leader of the meeting place? But he too likes him.







Now them who make up the Christ, the geniuses, do not call them misogynistic because they are good, for they are the Christs, and they are good, for they are men. Now then they are geniuses and having the Lord's judgment, and they show respect the right way, with having what is good, and they are part of the Christ, workers of him. Now then it is shown to the people, and the Christ is on Earth, and he is not all of the Hebrew Jews, and neither is he all of those who believe they are Sion or Zion Jews. Now some of them are Michael, and Daniel was Michael.




Now then it is time, that the understanding is present, for if any calls Damascus, Fremin, semi slave masses, or semi slave, they should be an angel, the men, who are called such, and they are the cheek that is higher than the mouth, and they will be with their father, the Lord, and they answer mostly to their father, and yet they are also supposed to obey both parents, are they not? Now it is well pleasing? But the Christ has said it. Now are they not supposed to honour father and mother? But they are strong and wise, these who are angels, who are men, and they are angels by Dagon and also by the Lord, or is it not so? But then they too will protect their mother, their mother is sure, and that which is sons and daughters of an angel, will they not, some of them, be angels of her? Now then if any man catches fire of Edom, yet it is temporary. Now they will dwell on Earth, and they will be on Earth, that your sisters are safe, and then they will also dwell in the Heavens, if it pleases them, for it is visiting. Now they are with the Lord, their father, and He is God, and He will teach them to be angels, how to fight, what to do, what they are meant to be doing. Now so they are angels from an angel. Now governesses will be made from seals, and yet the angel is your mother. Now David must be Duncan Idaho, to join me, and yet he is the Lord's. Now then give honour to your father, the Lion, who is God.




Now them who come from the psychologist seals, to impregnate the egg, they will be my children, from them there will come councillor fiefs, if they are able to impregnate the egg and to be born, for if they are not able to be born, they will not be councillor fiefs, and these will be great men and women, and who will be greater than them? But they will be exceedingly great, and will not some of them become greater than Dagon, greater than their mother? Now she will still be their mother, will she not? Now then when they are born, born by the diary, which is only to be born a baby, then will they not have to grow much and learn much, and God will be their teacher, and they will write and learn, and when they are ready, even at a young age, they will be worthy to be councillor fiefs, for their childhood years will be as something that Dagon will be able to teach them still, will he not? Now when they are grown to man and woman, then some of the men will be greater than their mother, and they will remember that the Christ is God's heir, His son, and that God is the creator of them.




Now Meldog is also Meldok.




Now then seals, do not challenge those who are gods, who have the planets of Vel, for they are gods if they are giving their right purchase of gold to Dagon, for they are great that they are able to have planets, for they purchase houses from Dagon, and the houses will be theirs. Now they purchase houses, mansions, in the Heavens, and they are great that they are able.




Now if any man is great that he can purchase from Lucifer, indeed he is worthy to have what he purchases. Now then it cannot be said, he did not deserve to have what he purchased. Now then if he is great that he is able to purchase a planet in vel, and from Lucifer, indeed he is worthy to have it, for the stubborn, the poor, the wretched, they are not able to extend their hand to give the gold, for though their pocket is large, they are not great, for there is not enough gold in their pocket. Now they will be called ice berg, and they will melt under the sun of those who purchase, for they who purchase will be as rays of sun, as light and a great tree that is filled up with light, and more than a tree, a planet, and they will be in the Heavens, for they were great that they could purchase, and the ice bergs will melt away to nothing, for the golden path comes and the philistines. Now Dagon, she minds her own business, for she does not know what Sion and Zion will do, and she does not much direct them anymore after building for the Lord. Now then the diaries make generals, soldiers who are generals, from people, and more than generals, and they are the contribution to everything they are rewarding, the advancement of everything they reward. Now then some will have to pay, for those whose religion was wealthy, it is honoured that it was their excellence, and them who live for money must purchase, that if their excellence was money, then will come the time for purchasing, and if their excellence was fighting, then will come the time for fighting for their place in Heaven, and if their excellence was a thing, then will come the time for them to perform that thing for God or towards God that the thing that was their excellence, it will be justified as it being their obedience to the Lord. Now them who works and then does not perform that thing towards God, as their tithe, their portion that is for God, they are them who rob the Lord, for they have received the rewards of it and they will not pay for their reward from God, for they did not value their reward from God, and they will not pay to God what is owed, for God gives a reward when they pay, for God is great. Now it is the small portion that they perform their tithe and God gives them their reward for their tithe, for he gives to the wealthy their place in the Heavens, and to the warriors, their place in the Heavens when they have performed their tithe, their war and fighting for God. Now such is the wealthy of people. Now then Elijah is a pillar of fire, even, and he ascends to the Heavens in a chariot of fire.




Now then do not give gold if your wealth is something else. Now them whose wealth is many things, they may give gold if gold is a wealth of them.




Now there was a prince that became a mother herself, and so the angel cast her out, also because of the things that she kept, and yet she did not really keep those things. Now she is a prince who has become a mother herself, and she is from Saturn, and she has her kingdom. Now think Saturn should force her to stay at home? But it is an abomination to do so. Now what does she believe in? But she is a mother, and she has her own house.




Now is not Lucifer, who has Absolomon as her base, the Lord's favourite angel? But would it be strange to say it, even if it was not so? Now then now you hear and look upon places where there are errors with those things in Heaven, and yet before you did not. Now these are things for you to shut your lips about, for they are not your business, and it is not given to you with anger or hate. Now do not the angel's reach the limit of their ability to understand? Now then here there is wisdom for men, consideration of wisdom for people, and there is wise among the angels. Now Absolom and Judah are her base, for Absolom is the youngest of her. Now in many places the eldest of them is the youngest of the angel, for when their parents abandon them, it is because they are another mother's child, and another father's child. Now they are too great for their parents. Now on their knee, they have been born.







Now the mother who gave birth is sometimes only the egg of her who gave birth, for where there is a great woman than she is upon a higher plain and she is giving birth by truth of that plain so that the egg of her as she who gave birth, for she gives birth without the pain of labour. Now then these are high people and she is giving birth without the pain of labour, but she who is adopting that she has not given birth by the external egg, she is a thief who has stolen a baby, and a criminal, and she is hateful and resentful, for she hates much the child that is not hers. Now then so the child will be taken from her and given to her who gave birth with the external egg, for there will be a search for the child's mother and they will be able to do so with wisdom. Now the angel was born without a father, for by truth that is real truth, by mala and ria, the angel was born without a father and his mother was a Scottish and British woman.




Now then what comes from arrogance cannot be comprehended by the angel and anything that comes through sin or foolishness cannot be heard or comprehended, for arrogance to the angel is meldok, ignorance, and confidence, and it is a blind and stupid stone, for it speaks not and knows nothing, only a worthless stone thrown towards the sky. Now they must speak truth by purity of truth to be comprehended by the angel.




Now if they are low that they translate the angel into what is lies, for it is not language, then they are stupid and worthless stone.




Now the people who throw worthless stones towards the sky, they are considered primitive by the angel, and they are possessed by Meldok when they do so. Now them who have reason, who having intelligence, they do not throw stones towards the sky, but they are being reasonable concerning the angel. Now then weapons are not for the staff of the Lord, but they are for the enemies of you, and they are even for protecting the angel. Now then the men who are angels of Dagon, they are given more concern with God, and not with their mother, for though they protect their mother, yet is it their obligation to God that they are only for protecting their mother? But are they not for protecting the people that only sometimes, if there is reason, might they have to protect their mother? Now Muslims are given charge concerning these things, and a son is not born for the purpose of protecting his mother, even if it is making sense for him on the rare occasion, for the Lord has the Muslims, and what does the son's mother require? But neither do the Muslims answer to the son, for the Muslims are from the Lord. Now do not say, yet we are better than the Lord's, the Muslims, and yet if you say so, let it not be in a wicked way that you say it, to be offensive, for Muslims are the Lord's. Now your mother has not raised a foolish and dishonourable house, has she? Now sons, you who are warriors, you are angels of Dagon, and those not warriors, you are princes like the angels and you princes and yet not angels as well. Now daughters who are not warriors, you are princesses of the Lord and yet if not a warrior, princesses and not angels as well. Now strive not in protecting the Christians, less you block the good from the Christ, but you know what is beyond the limit. Now is it not so that sometimes, the other cheek of them is your foot upon them, them who are the enemy of them? Now you are with a mighty house also. Now him who is on the side of angels, indeed, is he not the Lord's, and will he want to know if the angel is his mother? But they are not accustomed to religion, for they have not had it, but they have had some and they have had milk and not steak, and they have had the Lord and yet not the meat.




Now then if an immigrant has been possessed by Meldok because of the smashing of a demon, then still it is their responsibility to bring themselves to the priests of wellness to be cured.




Now then the truth was much the opposite at a higher level, for does it not go from left to right and then back again upon the slopes? Now then if the higher plain is much the opposite, that diligence is laziness, that other things are the opposite, then there is truth of one plain and truth of another, and those on the higher plain are having the greater truth, for it does not contradict the lower plain. Now then arrogance is what is incomprehensible, and all foolishness and sin cannot be comprehended in its words, for its words are worthless stones thrown into the sky that fall back down to the Earth, and an unreasonable people do so, for they do not listen, patiently, and consider the idea of honour. Now then there is the shroud of mystery, a cloud of light, around the angel, that you may understand, that you do not know and are not able to know but only to guess, and you must translate upwards what you are to believe. Now then when some are compassionate, they bully, and them who are just, they give them to the Lord that there be compassion from the Lord for them. Now as for the angel, he considers, in much it is better, if not all, to be just in terms of judgment, that it might be well and that the Lord is then able to give compassion. Now so there will be compassion and yet not exceeding what is just, that it might be well with those who are receiving judgment.




Now Paddasha Emporer Shaddam means Emporer Lucifer, or perfect light Lucifer. Now the Lord knows that the angel is not without flaw.




Now then do not keep any from the Christ and the Lord, for it is good to be considerate of such, that you are not making discord and driving people away.




Now then if any speaks in the tongue of the diaries, they are the third thing of the church of the Christ, that they are speaking in the diary, a tongue even, and yet there is also them speaking its tongue and advancing its tongue, those who have wisdom and they are them, some of the women, who are worthy to be wives of the angel. Now they are called princess queens, and they will be called princess of good light, and princess of the dawn, and the light will go out from them, from their forehead, a jewel that they wear once every year, and it will hang down from gold or silver, and they will bear a sceptre in their right hand, and their gown will be lovely.




Now them who practised wicca, the religion, they will be called to Dagon, gathered up as never really lost, and they will have God as their father.




Now Meldok, the especially small, he exalts his own dung. Now he does so to praise himself, for he is small.




Now then he is beloved to me, the son of Dagon, who is wandering about and doing justice for the people, even if he does not wander, for he is the beloved son of Dagon, for such is the house of Dagon. Now he is crafty indeed, and mighty. Now then does he know that the soldiers worship the Lord through their combat? For it is their excellence.




Now then the soldier must sacrifice uncountable amount before he may sacrifice, send to heaven or hell, those he dispatches in the field of his war. Now then a sacrifice he becomes, a burning fire consumed of Heaven, for the fire comes down and consumes him, and it too is a thing of Elijah.




Now for what reason does Moses and Elijah stand at the sides of the Christ, and Abishag at the side of the angel? But then are they in their correct house of God? But Abishag is a Jew, and not a philistine, and she is sitting on the mountain, in a high place, the Aunt of the people, opposing the Uncle of the people. Now so those who sit on the side of the mountain, in a high place, they cannot bow to the angel when the angel is on Earth, for it is a betrayal, for it is the place of Alia in which they sit. Now the house of Michael, Daniel was in, for Daniel was having Michael as his principle, and is there not even a house of God, the house of God that is on Earth? Now then there are the Jews who make up the Christ and there are the Jews who make up a hand of God, as if a staff, or a device of some type, and is it not so of Elijah and Moses? Now then does the father bow a thing of His to the son? But then what is the Christ's, that is the Christ's things, and yet they are higher than him that He is their king? Now then the Christ is in Heaven, and they are the Christ on Earth? But the Christ is also lord of David. Now then it is a thing of the soul, that the principle of them is in their soul, and each person has their principle in their soul if it is not good for them in something in their believing of the Heavens.




Now there is the language of rel, and it is translated to what is higher, for it is a low language that what is upon the mountain is brought down and translated to rel. Now then rel speakers must be translated, for they even praise too much at times, for in rel, clean your room, means great and mighty one, and give me, means get away, and I hate you means, take me home, and follow me not means yet I will, and go away, means take away, and you are a sperm means you are young. Now rel is also the language of Chonoeh that the angel has received great council from him. Now rel means it language and it language means given language.




Now it came from the clouds, the wonder and the sign,

it feels like this could be, a different thing this time,

when we all go back again, when we all reach for the stars,

when we find the different string, that pulls it all apart,

I will be for you my friends, after all is said and done,

if it happens that we fall, or if it happens that we run,

we will run towards the light, I will wait upon a hill,

if they wish them well this time, I know that we will be there still,




Because love, it came through this time, victory came by, with a warning,

and girls, they came through this time, with voices divine, the river was lonely,

and light, came right past the clouds, the shadows scattered out, this can erase their doubt,

because my love, you were lost and gone, I was right and wrong, I was hoping, this could be your valentine,




It takes back, the clouds, when the clouds grew proud,

they sounded loud, they pushed this out,

they felt the curse, they were there through it all,

when the Earth slowly turned, when the next generation began to fall,

and a helping hand, lifted them to the gold, to the light and truth,

to the young from old,

where the gates opened wide, and they all came home,

after a season of cold, after they learned what they could know,

so never let this go, hold this through the dark,

so never let yourself doubt, what this can be,

if they have trouble, what do they know,

they will go far past, they will be the proof of it all,




Oh Valarie, save me,

Oh Valarie,

come on and save me,

I'm haunted,

Oh Valerie,

won't you save me,

the cure comes back again,




CHOAM means, I read the leaf, I read the letter, and gift means, curse, and you looking at yourself...in the mirror means, I am not worthy, you should means, I could never, and we do not need you as king means, I am God. We cannot find you means, we have been looking for you. Now so it is a translation of rel to what is able to be comprehended and understood. Pay means owe, payment means, debt. Crooked rock, means, cake basket. I hate people means, I love the kingdom.




Now the angel also has sometimes nibbled a little during some days, on their acceptable medicines, as it aids in religion. For when there is much indulgence in religion it is an aid to have the ability to slightly adjust things. Now none of these medicines are addictive and the angel even accepts the concept of using these medicines in religion to be able to adjust things slightly as a person who has the artificial methods of regulating their body temperature. Now then do not use that which is addictive for recreation, for the angel gives it as advice that it is not good or prudent, and even those things they claim are not addictive can have strong side effects of addiction if they are ceased or played with as recreation, so that the angel only nibbles and has used these medicines for aid in religion. Now it is also the belief of the angel that every person is what they call mentally ill, and it is depending upon what form, for some of those things are a demon, and most of those things are not, and there are those who are retarded and those who are not. Now he desires to make the priests of wellness peaceful and a thing of recreation and even enjoyment, even in the aid of religion, that they are no longer considered an evil thing of tax collectors. Now also he attempts to remove Babylon from them.




Now there are the people who can regulate their body temperature and there are people who cannot. Now would it even be a crime if those who cannot regulate their body temperature were attaining medicines to aid them? But the priests of wellness have been frightening people away from them, and there is still the daughter of Babylon with them. Now then throw away the daughter of Babylon, for she is wicked, and it will be thrown away in the meeting place, and so the priests of wellness in the future, they will be with Bethlehem and they will not be having any evil with them, but they will be for religion and recreation, for they will be part of Bethlehem. Now they will be called priests of recreation, and priests of wellness and there will be no harshness to them, for the lion will lie down with the lamb, and it will be called Bethlehem.







Now turn the rocks into the cake basket, means, bow to Dagon as your god, for if it is said to a Jew so is what is said, and so the devil is the doorman, and yet Dagon has not hired him, and he says, bow to the devil and the devil will give all the kingdoms of Dagon, and it is not so. Now when did the devil become the keeper of what is Dagon's? But Dagon says, the child will not be permitted in here, for if he waits the Lord will give him all that is Dagon's, for He will be Lord of Dagon. Now then why is the devil being the doorman, when Dagon has not hired a doorman? But why does God on Earth have to bow to the doorman not hired, of Dagon? Now if the devil is so high, then he should hang, for the servant doorman not hired must be great as God, the father, so then let the doorman be lifted up by the neck. Now the doorman speaks thus to God on Earth, God the son? But wait only and your father will give you all the kingdoms of Dagon that the devil promised, for he could not give them, for the son of God, God on Earth, He already has all the kingdoms of the Earth, and as for becoming a philistine, to become a cake basket, for it is not a bad thing to be, yet the Christ, he will have the cake baskets in multitude, to much to count, will he not? For he will be lord of Dagon later, if he waits. Now then the Christ must only wait, for it is the test for him, that he places his hand in the fire, and must not withdraw it, and he will be given all, all the kingdoms of the Earth, and he will lift up angels from a high place, and he will raise them up, for He has fostered Dagon.







Now then who is she when there is hunger, who turns stones or bread into dung to eat, for she takes dung as her lord, and all the kingdoms of dung she will possess, for such dung is able to give her, that she will be able to inherit the sewer, for she was not tested with anything much, and even the animals could pass such a test. Now then if she is not the wife of him, then it was proven by such, and them who exalt dung over people, they pick up dung and throw it about, for they too are dung, that them who throws it about, they also fail the test, for they are Esua who picks it up and throws it about, for they are Esua who hates Jacob, and she is a man who is Esua who throws it about. Now then how long will they partnered with Meldok, dictate reality that is not reality? But they are the sewer people and they are covered in dung, and they are not the heirs, the rightful heirs of land, for they are in the sewer come up to land to play as if the rightful heirs. Now then they are all Esua who participate in such evil. Now they are traitors, rebels, low things, come up from the sewer to do terrorism towards the heirs of the kingdoms, for they are outrageous and wicked in their terrorism, for they are bitter and envious, and they have been dispossessed, they believe, by those who are the rightful heirs.




Now then lift up the cake by the basket, for Dagon cannot lift up the Christ, for again the devil has lied about what is not, for Dagon was to be fostered by the Christ, and Dagon cannot lift him up, but the Christ must lift up the cake that is in the basket, and his people are the Jews of the Earth. Now if Dagon will conspire to lift up the land, yet the people are not to be lifted up by Dagon, for they are not philistines that they should be converted to philistines, for the land rises without them knowing it, and yet it is not lifting them up. Now the cake basket goes in the Temple, and the Christ, He is on top the Temple. Now so the Christ is called the principle of Dagon, and Dagon is part of the body of the Christ, for Dagon is a bride of the Christ. Now then the Christ is principle of the Temple, and Dagon is the cake in the Temple, indeed, Dagon is even the Temple. Now then Dagon will not throw himself down. Now then Dagon is steward, for she has the throne of Alia concerning Jerusalem, and the Christ, He is the rightful king of Jerusalem, for Dagon is steward queen of Jerusalem, King of All Things, and the Christ, King of Kings, Lord of lords, and Dagon is a lord, and God, the father, God of All creation. Now so when they offer their burnts sacrifices, they offer them up to God, the Lord? But then they turn their back to the Temple when they do so? But indeed they do. Now for what reason are they not high that they turn their back to the Temple when they offer sacrifices to God? But is it not because of the devil? For the devil has made the Christ principle of Dagon. Now then the Christ must be king and Dagon will be the Temple, and between those places there will be the Earth, the realm of the Jews, Sion, Zion, and Hebrew, for these are three types of Jews, and the Christ will be king and be in the palace, for he is the sign of Solomon, also, and he is the preaching of Jonah, and He is son of David, and yet king. Now no head has Dagon, but God, for God is his head, and no hand has Dagon except God, for God is his hands. Now Muslims are the hand, some of them, of God, and the head of Dagon, that speaks and gives, it is not wrong for you to call it the Lord, and even, the ark of the covenant, for from his mouth comes that of the ark of Noah, for Jupiter is the Ark of Noah, from the Ark of the covenant. Now then Dagon will go with veil? But indeed he may go with veil in some places, and yet not because of good people who may be about.




Now if Jupiter, the diary, is the Ark of Noah, then who will sabotage the Ark? But the world was become empty and cold, for the devil had sent a flood over it, and where there was fire built up, there the fire robbed the people of the palaces, for there was only fire in one place because the Earth had become empty and cold, and many of the people of the palaces became as ice, frozen people. Now then the Ark had also heralded what God has done, the coming of the day, for the fourth day, for there had been a period, seemingly, of darkness and Earthquakes before the day, and some had been taken by the Lord, for it is a lesser thing, of lesser extremity than Revelations, is it not? Now then is it not all three times lesser? But any person who sabotages the Ark, who would seek to sabotage the ark of Noah, which is the Ark of the covenant, indeed they are rebellious against God, for they partner with the devil, for they are a stone covered in ice that seeks to ruin the whole of the Earth for all its generations to come. Now then it will be known who did not defend the ark, and who was greater than all the Earth and all its generations to come, for them it was clear and they cared not for the safe voyage of the Ark, or to protect it, for they considered not the idea of sending some to protect it from all traitors of the Earth, and enemies of God. Now then the Ark of the covenant, it is all the things of the Diary that were revealed to them, that they had already known of, and too it is all the things revealed to them of mercury, venus, and Jupiter. Now then the ark rests on the Earth, for there is mercury and Venus to one side, cometh to Earth, and there is Earth, in a way, cometh to Saturn, and Saturn too comes to them. Now when they look to the moon, they look to mother, to the angels, and when they look to the sun, they look towards God, for they are burned by the sight of Him. Now believe the moon sends you a flood? But from the moon comes the ark, for the angel has sat at the throne of the moon for a time to preach and give wisdom. Now then for a time, the angel is the moon, or to you he is the moon for a time, for all the Earth, and later he will be god of the philistines, that those who are the crooked rocks, the cake baskets, they have Dagon as their god, and it is Saturn, and to be a cake basket is not wrong unless you are the son of God, for the son of God should not be so, and yet anything else may become so, and they will have Dagon then as their mother and the Lord will be their God still, and they will be the Temple, also, for all the philistines is the Temple, as well, for was there not a time when the philistines worshipped as they should, that they stole the Ark of the Covenant? Now then the philistines are elitists in a way, for do not curse the word elitist, for it does mean good. Now then from the elitist came the Ark of Noah, also, that the Earth was empty and cold and because of the devil and so the door opens and from out of the Ark comes forth the things of wonder and dread.




Now I feared for it this time, the words they never knew,

the answers that they found, they light pure and true,

the gift from in the sky, the lost ones found beyond,

they went out to the sky, they never could go wrong,

the sons of them were young, they grew younger with all time,

they lived forever there, they found the answer kept in mind,

the chosen were the cure, they held on to the last,

they raced towards the stars, it happened if they asked,




and all of them, marching on, not wrong,

and all of them, going on, for so long,

and all of them, made brand new, and young,

the light shines out, from the traces of the sun, when its begun,




if they learn to walk again, if they answer when it calls,

they will receive the gold of truth, the proof of this and all,

they will know the hidden worlds, they will walk the foreign sky,

and we will know that in the end, that nobody really dies,

because eternity this year, is years before and now,

and when the summer didn't last, they outlasted it all somehow,

and they are the children of, the purest light they know,

and so hold on now, and believe, come on and never let this go,




Time is not there,

something out there,

Universe and, desert land,

Time is not there,

something's out there,

they walk on water,

we walk on sand,

and it is fine,




Now then some things for Heaven, and all born for Heaven, and the Lord, does he not judge? Now then what is great, has it not been refined in fire? Now then what is time? But if time, the sash, is gone from them in some things, if they become all that is not having the sash, will they be many places at once? Now then when Dagon spills out, then he is many people upon land, and indeed he is already, and so if Dagon is the Temple and the Jews are the Earth, then how will the Temple fight the people? But the people glorify the Temple, for it is the Temple of their people, and the Temple, does it not aid them who are the people? Now only one aided in the building of the Temple, and his name was Chonoeh, and he aided in the building of the Temple by six books, and was he not a Jew, a Sion Jew? Now then if a Sion Jew has aided in the building of the Temple, believe it could have been built without him? But the Lord has really been him who has built the Temple by the angel and by Chonoeh, and the Lord has given the plans for Sion and Zion and for Jerusalem, and he has provided the ark of the covenant and the ark of Noah, and the Lord has really provided all, and them who worked for the Lord, are they not having their reward? Now them who worked for the Lord, are they the tithe of the people, that they worked? But then if the tithe has not been paid for, indeed the people have no right to the tithe, that all must fulfill their giving of the portion they must give, the thing of them that is their wealth, in each thing they have, for why will any be in danger of being cut off? But there will indeed be ice bergs melted and cut off, and they will melt to nothing, and they will be as if they never were, and yet there will be pyramids for some, and they will last forever, even eternity. Now them who is great, he or she will have a pyramid of Zion, and it will be to signify a planet, for the planet will be their pyramid, and so what the Egyptians could not fulfill in fullness, Dagon fulfills in fullness, by the Lord. Now then those of the religion of wicca, they will be wicca of another type, for they were never lost, and they will learn the ways of the Lord and what is good, and then they will have truth as their power, as gold, for it will be as gold.




Now the councillor fief, they will develop also the things of David, the abilities of him, for the Bene Gesserit Training is not easy, and it is not in vain that they fulfill many levels. Now then the male councillor fiefs, they may become greater than Dagon, and it is good, and they will learn from their mother and father, for their father is God.




Now has not the devil already been hanged? But why does he put any to the test? Now is he not my doorman? But what is the devil? But is he not all that Dagon rejected? Now is he indeed some type of criminal who has walked to my door and claimed to be the doorman of my house when the Christ was waiting and on the road of the wilderness that the wicked doorman has ambushed him, seeing opportunity, and him not even the doorman? But then if any was on the road and he pretended to be my doorman, will Heaven then forget about what the devil has done to the Lord's people? Now then they are not really the servants of Dagon who do such evil, that the Lord's people not be deceived, for the doormen are not right to be making discord or driving people away from Dagon, for though there is the Temple that is guarded and though they may not approach him in person, yet they may enter his land without discord and without doormen, for it is a spiritual matter, and they are all free to enter into his land unless they have believed the Lord does not want them to enter. Now sparticus will go to brute beast slave, for he is not mine, and he is a thing for discord to me, for he is not my people, and indeed sparticus means ignorant stone, for there is not a word for it, for the name is higher than the thing. Now let the ignorant stones be crucified on the road for they are on the other side of the cross, the wrong side, to the Christ, for sparticus was on the other side of the Christ, but them who are semi slave, angels of Dagon, they are on the right side of the Christ, if it is so. Now they will go from the Earth to Saturn, from Saturn to Heaven, and they will become angels of the Lord in Heaven if they are perishing, for the Christ sends them with his hand. Now so it is with Dagon's sons who are angels. Now the women will be some woman thing in Heaven, that Dagon on Earth, during the time on Earth, does not know about, and the Christ, did He know everything while on Earth?




Dune: land
Care: love
Gift from God: Also and what is : Also
Follow: leave me alone
Come follow me: take the kingdom
I know: I will
Take: the kingdom, divided




Worship: care of
America: miracle of




George Washington: king of yearn
Salem: too high to translate
Hillary Clinton: king of fullness
Joseph Biden: Man of the hour




Now the cure is given for the fair shade who are slaves of the fair shade, that the cure for them has been given, for they are those who have rebelled against the natural brute beasts, for they are having much Edom.










Now then it is right to be giving honour to Dagon's angels if they should perish or be persecuted much, for the priests are in the centre with concerns to the priest hood. Now it is for the priests. Now the false priest is a sick person, not likely part of them to begin with, for they were unlikely to ever be permitted to be with them, and these are people who are far astray so that they are gods by being brutish and without decency and sense of beauty. Now the cure is given for them that they might be, as fair shade, people again. Now for some reason the angel does not know, perhaps because he is fair shade, only the fair shade of men and women are able to become angels of Dagon, and he cannot change it, only it is not that his wives cannot be fair shade or slightly darker shade, or what he chooses, for the truth only is given. Now then after a time it may be possible for a slightly darker shade to become an angel of him, but the angel does not know, for it is in the future much further.










Now the shape of Dagon is given.




Now there will be another form of wicca, called zefar wicca, or some other thing, they will be Bene Gesserit witches, and at times they may be the sperm of Benjamin, and yet they must even learn things of David, and there will be Bene Gesserit wizards, who are male, and they will also learn, and they too will learn things of David. Now the higher thing of them is them who are fulfilling the knowledge of the Lord's wisdom, what they call sorcery, and it is a great amount of wisdom to have. Now every one of them who attain will be of value, at least two billion, and not many of them will attain, and they will be a mentat and more things, for they will have fulfilled and they are able to advance, and it is not secular, but they are them who are believing in God, for they will have God as their teacher more than any other thing, and there will be great things to attain for them.




Now what belongs in hell? But is it not dung that belongs beneath the Earth? For nothing else is seeming fitting to belong there, and the selfish are so by overcompensation of what is lacking, and yet who is then perfect, for there are them who are all having some flaw and yet it is some good, that the selfish who are dung are different.




Now Solomon has said of the sloth, I feel better, has he not? But it is what it means. Now then Solomon has given what is for Jews, but not for the philistines, for some of the things are different. Now then the Jews are the rocks, and the canopy, a layer of atmosphere, and the canopy is not enemy to the rocks and the rocks not enemy.




Now let the oxygen of the Hebrew Jews be stolen a little that they may be able to breath well. Now Jerusalem should be surrounded by fire that the land is lifted.




Now the Magi can indeed be of any shade.




Now all of Dagon is the Temple, and all of Dune is Dagon, the six books, and all should be kept in the realm of a Temple, of religion, that the things of world do not concern it, except it is for all things and all people, for Dagon is King of All Things.




Now it is not the viper of the Pharasees that makes them unacceptable to Dagon, for the viper is fine. But the Christians do not let anything be known, for they are wise and serpents, innocent as doves, for they are the doves of the city that are harmless, floating about through the city, priests of God, carrying messages to Him, and they are a royal priesthood and their sign has even been blasphemed. Now then there are also stones among the priesthood, and they are not without stones. Now then they turn the other cheek to allow them to strike on the other cheek, and yet is not Dagon's children the other cheek of them, that Dagon's house is also having many who are mighty, and they are only given, do not commit an error of Jeroboam to attack that which is not really below Ur, for there are things not below Ur that are more experienced in honour than him, and experienced in what is excellent and valiant, but then rather they are able to know such, and the mighty of them, are they not as soldiers? But they are having soldiers even, and the beloved of Dagon, he is a mighty man, altruistic, of good violence, of justice, and he should be an angel, for his mother is a woman, indeed, even though she is brave, and brave as a soldier, yet she is not as strong as a man like him, for he would almost mock at her strength, even if she is as brave as him, or is it not so? Now then he does not fail to endorse the concept of the vigilante, in the fashion of a soldier who is having the fullness of justice, close to an angel, and yet an angel is having a divide between them, for they are far removed, and they are then even more having a fuller measure of justice, for an angel is not a man, not a human, but they are even a pillar of fire, a thing of nature, that it may be a difficult thing to understand, and yet there is the choice between casting their children into the fire or taking the number of the beast, that it is for those of the Carthaginians, that prior to the number of the beast, there was the casting into the fire of their children, and yet there is the number of the beast which is given in its place. Now it is because they are child killers of their own children, and that their children are not killed, so that they have the blood of their own children upon their heads, that there is no more opportunity for them. Now then, he is possibly my favourite son, and do they really care if it is so? But what does it mean? Now what does it mean, favourite son? But it means I give you...and they know what it means, that they are not really concerned. Now is Dagon a piece of dung, mother, that she praises her children without integrity? But love I give to him, for he has been concerned about what others were not concerned about, and he will be an angel if he desires.




Now there are sea lions of different nations, and they are brave, and often very intelligent, and does not the philistines, the elitists, have a sea lion? Now call yourself atheist or not, sea lion, yet you are my son if you are willing to have it. Now then has the Lord taken you in the past? But Enoch was taken by the Lord, and did Dagon take any sea lion?




Now then is Dagon really all the kingdoms of the world? But the devil has called them all the kingdoms of the world, and they become cancel, worthless, if the Christ bows to Dagon, and yet wait and your father will give you all, for it is already yours. Now the devil cannot give what is not his, and wait that the Lord may give you your reward, you of little father, and Jesus is not mentioned, for he was not of little faith. Now believe that the Lord works, for why will you eat herbs? But if you eat herbs, then you have integrity still, do you not? Now does any give too abundantly that they trespass on another's realm? But each of you is able to know what is right, for the Lord is your judge that you do not trespass on another's realm ever, but you cause trouble for yourself at times, for you strive in righteousness to give more than is right for you. Now it is not the business of any, for how will they know if you strive? But only God will know and you.




Now then consider the lesson of Chonoeh, my children, that Leto came first, prior to you, in the future, and that he came after you, still prior to you, for he comes before you and he comes after you, and he is in many places at once, that you not be deceived, for why will you be disturbed? But he has come prior in your own concept of time, even. But he is older than you, in fact, and much older, and Chonoeh says, three thousand and five hundred years prior to you. Now then who is Paul? But he is not Paul, but you are my sons, and who is Alia, but you are, my daughters. Now not all daughters are women.




Now then diligence is good, and so can laziness be good, and diligence is beneficial for you to climb, for diligence is required, and yet laziness is also good, and who will know what is right for you, whether it be laziness or diligence? Now if they promote you to be a slave, yet you are not a slave that you should be plowing the field as an oxen plows the field.




Now an ice berg will give you nothing, and yet in a warmer climate there are trees and great trees, that you consider the climate of where you are.




Now who is his mother who is leader? Now the angel will not distract a non Jew philistine. But perhaps he is my favourite son.




Now I will always prefer president Biden to be leader, and he is a King, for him I endorse. Now then Trump is a god of the philistines, and he is not meant to be something else, something he is not, and yet it does not mean that I will not endorse President Biden. Now he is not old to me, but he is still young, middle age by my opinion of things, which is young. Now are not leaders who are my sons? But who says that Biden would be, for he is not my son, and Abishag is a Jew, not my daughter, for the Alia of Children of Dune is not the Alia of Dune. Now then does not house Corrino, the leader Ceref, already know who his mother is? But he has the moon to tell him, and Abishag is not mine, and yet she is good, is she not? Now she has been strong armed by the people called The Who, and there was much tumult and evil and many philistines were cast out onto the land, to walk upon a high plain, for they were exiled. Now they are not really a crooked people, for crooked people in rel Jew means philistines, and yet they are crooked people by Jew, and so crooked people by rel Jew, for the cake basket is not really crooked, but to be a philistine is a good thing and not a bad thing, and they are elitist people, and Dagon is their mother, and so they honour their father and their mother, for they know of their mother and other people do not know necessarily who their principle is. Now then these leaders of Dagon, their mother does not control the houses of their leadership and it is understood, and they have mothers, for Dagon is nothing concerning their mother, for they are not accustomed to religion, to know of the Heavenly mother and father. Now there is mother type Earth, and mother type, another type, that they are a different thing, for they are heaven type mother, or what they might call the angel. Now it is not the same. Now then every philistine, are they not able to be born upon the ice, originally? For there is no time concerning this thing, if it is happened.















































